Washington statutes.
RCW 18.321.150

Consistent effect—Conflict with other state laws.

(1) A licensee providing services in a remote state under a multistate authorization to practice shall adhere to the laws and regulations, including laws, regulations, and applicable standards, of the remote state where the client is located at the time care is rendered.

(2) Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the compact.

(3) Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member state in conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

(4) All permissible agreements between the commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms.

[ 2024 c 176 s 17.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 176: See note following RCW 18.321.005.